Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chancery Clerks

§ 9-5-131.
Bond of clerk.

The clerk of the chancery court, before he enters upon the duties of the office, shall take the oath of office and give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of all the state and county taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the county for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office for such clerk; however, such bond shall not exceed the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). Such clerk may be required by the court, or the chancellor in vacation, to give additional bond in any particular case, which shall be a cumulative security, and shall not in any manner affect the liability on his official bond for any matter covered by it. His official bond shall be held to cover all his official acts, and all moneys which may come into his hands according to law or by order of the court or chancellor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, art. 4 (1); 1857, ch. 62, art. 12; 1871, § 990; 1880, § 1807; 1892, § 460; 1906, § 509; Hemingway’s 1917, § 266; 1930, § 325; 1942, § 1235; Laws, 1984, ch. 474; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 10; Laws, 1991, ch. 604, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-5-132.
Training and continuing education course requirements for chancery clerks; filing of certificate of compliance; penalty for failure to file; courses; expenses; continuing education credit for attendance at chancery court proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided herein, no chancery clerk elected for a full term of office commencing on or after January 1, 1996, shall exercise any functions of office or be eligible to take the oath of office unless and until the chancery clerk has filed in the office of the circuit clerk a certificate of completion of a course of training and education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center within six (6) months of the beginning of the term for which such chancery clerk is elected. A chancery clerk who has completed the course of training and education and has satisfied his annual continuing education course requirements, and who is then elected for a succeeding term of office subsequent to the initial term for which he completed the training course, shall not be required to repeat the training and education course upon reelection. Any chancery clerk who has served a full or partial term before January 1, 1996, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, after taking office by election or otherwise, each chancery clerk shall be required to file annually in the office of the circuit clerk a certificate of completion of a course of continuing education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College. No chancery clerk shall have to comply with this subsection unless he will have been in office for five (5) months or more during a calendar year.

Each chancery clerk elected for a term commencing on or after January 1, 1992, shall be required to file annually the certificate required in subsection (2) of this section commencing January 1, 1994.

The requirements for obtaining the certificates in this section shall be as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

Upon the failure of any chancery clerk to file with the circuit clerk the certificates of completion as provided in this section, such chancery clerk shall, in addition to any other fine or punishment provided by law for such conduct, not be entitled to any fee, compensation or salary, from any source, for services rendered as chancery clerk, for the period of time during which such certificate remains unfiled.

The Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center shall prepare and conduct courses of training for basic and continuing education for chancery clerks of this state. The basic course of training shall be known as the “Chancery Clerks Training Course” and shall consist of at least thirty-two (32) hours of training. The continuing education course shall be known as the “Continuing Education Course for Chancery Clerks,” and shall consist of at least eighteen (18) hours of training. The content of the basic and continuing education courses and when and where such courses are to be conducted shall be determined by the judicial college. The judicial college shall issue certificates of completion to those chancery clerks who complete such courses.

The expenses of the training, including training of those elected as chancery clerk who have not yet begun their term of office, shall be borne as an expense of the office of the chancery clerk.

Chancery clerks shall be allowed credit toward their continuing education course requirements for attendance at chancery court proceedings if the presiding chancery court judge certifies that the chancery clerk was in actual attendance at a term or terms of court; provided, however, that at least twelve (12) hours per year of the continuing education course requirements must be completed at a regularly established program or programs conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 595, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 9-5-133.
How clerk of chancery court may appoint deputies.

The clerk of the chancery court shall have power, with the approbation of the court, or of the judge in vacation, to appoint one or more deputies, who shall take the oath of office, and who thereupon shall have power to do and perform all the acts and duties which their principal may lawfully do; such approval, when given by the judge in vacation, shall be in writing, and shall be entered on the minutes of the court at the next term.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, class 2, art. 1 (12); class 3 art. 1 (10); 1857, ch. 61, art. 17, ch. 62, art. 13; 1871, §§ 551, 990; 1880, § 2281; 1892, § 930; 1906, § 1006; Hemingway’s 1917, § 726; 1930, § 747; 1942, § 1662.

§ 9-5-135.
Clerk to attend court and keep minutes.

The clerk shall, in person or by deputy, attend all the sessions of the court, and shall keep minute books, in which he shall record, under the directions of the chancellor, all the proceedings of the court; and the minutes of the preceding day shall be read by him each morning of the session in open court, and the last day’s proceedings shall be read by him in open court before adjournment, and the minutes must be signed by the chancellor.

The clerk, at his option, may elect to keep the minute books by means of electronic filing or storage or both, as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57 in lieu of or in addition to any paper records.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 15; 1871, § 991; 1880, § 1808; 1892, § 461; 1906, § 510; Hemingway’s 1917, § 267; 1930, § 326; 1942, § 1236; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-137.
Other duties of the clerk.

It shall be the duty of the clerk to preserve and keep all records, files, papers and proceedings belonging to his office, and to record all last wills and testaments which may be probated; all letters testamentary, of administration, and guardianship; all accounts allowed; all inventories, appraisements, and reports duly returned; all instruments which are duly proved, and which by law are required to be recorded in his office, in well-bound books to be kept for that purpose, each class in a separate book or books, or by means of electronic filing or storage or both in addition to or in lieu of any such physical records as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as the clerk may elect; all records shall be properly indexed. He shall issue all process which may be required of him by law or by order of the court, or the chancellor in vacation; and shall discharge all other duties which may be required of him by law, or which properly appertain to the duties of his office. The clerk shall be under the direction of the court in termtime, and of the chancellor in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 996; 1880, § 1822; 1892, § 477; 1906, § 526; Hemingway’s 1917, § 283; 1930, § 327; 1942, § 1237; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-139.
Chancery clerk’s office at Biloxi.

In Harrison County, a county with two judicial districts, it shall be the duty of the chancery clerk to keep in his office at Biloxi, suitable record books or electronic equipment for the purpose of recording deeds, deeds of trust and other conveyances, instruments and contracts required by law to be recorded, and all deeds, deeds of trust, mortgages, contracts, wills and other conveyances and contracts, and all muniments of title, documents and other papers required by law to be filed, enrolled or recorded relating to property situated in said second judicial district, shall be properly filed, enrolled or recorded in the office of said clerk at Biloxi, in books or by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as he may elect, and to be kept for that purpose in his said office at Biloxi. All official bonds shall be recorded by said clerk as required by law in the offices of the said clerk at Gulfport and at Biloxi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-141.
Acts clerk may perform at any time.

The clerk or his deputy may at any time receive and file all bills, petitions, motions, accounts, inventories, reports, or other papers offered for that purpose, and may issue all process authorized by law and proper in any matter or proceeding. He may also at any time, in termtime or vacation, perform the following functions; issue warrants of appraisement to appraise the personal estate of decedents; allow and register claims against estates being administered in the court of which he is clerk; make all orders and issue all process necessary for the collection and preservation of estates of decedents, minors, and persons of unsound mind; appoint some person to collect and preserve the estate of any decedent in the state in any case provided for; grant letters of administration to the husband or wife, or other person entitled thereto; take the proof of wills, admit wills to probate, in common form, grant letters testamentary, letters of administration with the will annexed, and de bonis non; appoint guardians for minors, persons of unsound mind, and convicts of felony; grant letters of administration; institute suits in cases provided for, and, whenever an appeal shall be taken from the grant of letters testamentary, of administration, or guardianship, appoint some fit person to discharge the duties pending the appeal. He may do all such other acts as are provided by law and by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 995; 1880, § 1814; 1892, § 468; 1906, § 517; Hemingway’s 1917, § 274; 1930, § 337; 1942, § 1248; Laws, 1914, ch. 212; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-5-143.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-5-143. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 38; 1871, § 1020; 1880, § 1815; 1892, § 469; 1906, § 518; Hemingway’s 1917, § 275; 1930, § 338; 1942, § 1249]

§ 9-5-145.
How proceedings before clerk to be conducted.

In all applications and proceedings before the clerk in vacation or in term time, the same pleadings and evidence and forms shall be observed, and the same process and service and return shall be necessary, as though the proceedings were before the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 995; 1880, § 1821; 1892, § 476; 1906, § 525; Hemingway’s 1917, § 282; 1930, § 339; 1942, § 1250; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 9-5-147.
All acts of clerk subject to approval or disapproval.

All acts, judgments, orders, or decrees made by the clerk in term time or vacation or at rules, shall be subject to the approval or disapproval of the court of which he is clerk, and shall not be final until approved by the court. All such orders and proceedings of the clerk may, by order of the chancellor in vacation, be suspended until a hearing before him in court, and shall be subject to such orders and decrees as the court may make.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 38; 1871, §§ 995, 1020; 1880, §§ 1815, 1819; 1892, §§ 470, 474; 1906, §§ 519, 523; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 276, 280; 1930, § 340; 1942, § 1251; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 9-5-149.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-5-149. [Codes, 1880, § 1816; 1892, § 471; 1906, § 520; Hemingway’s 1917, § 277; 1930, § 341; 1942, § 1252; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 4]

§ 9-5-151.
How minutes of proceedings before clerk preserved and approved.

The minutes so kept of proceedings in vacation or in term time shall constitute a record of the office and shall be carefully preserved as such, free from erasure or alteration; and, at the first term thereafter of the court, in the case of minutes in vacation, or in the case of minutes in term time before the clerk at that term or the first term thereafter, shall be examined by the court and if approved, shall thereby become the minutes of the court, as if entered at a term thereof; and all the orders and decrees entered in said minutes in vacation, shall, by such approval of the court, become final and be as valid and effectual as if done by the court when they were done by the clerk.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1817; 1892, § 472; 1906, § 521; Hemingway’s 1917, § 278; 1930, § 342; 1942 § 1253; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 9-5-153.
How approval of clerk’s minutes and orders shown.

The approval by the court of minutes entered in vacation or in term time, and adoption of the orders and decrees made by the clerk, may be evidenced by an order of the court approving such orders and decrees, excepting such as may be specified as not approved. It shall not be necessary to enter on the minutes of the court, in term time, any of said orders or decrees made in vacation or in term time, but the same, as entered in vacation or in term time, shall, by the approval of the court, become the acts of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1818; 1892, § 473; 1906, § 522; Hemingway’s 1917, § 279; 1930, § 343; 1942, § 1254; Laws, 1974, ch. 449, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 9-5-155.
Bonds examined by chancellor.

The chancellor shall, at each term of the court, carefully examine all bonds taken by the clerk in vacation, in pursuance of any order of the court, or the requirement of law, in any proceeding in such court, and make such orders in reference thereto as he shall deem necessary for the security of the parties interested therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 995; 1880, § 1820; 1892, § 475; 1906, § 524; Hemingway’s 1917, § 281; 1930, § 344; 1942, § 1255.

§ 9-5-157.
Register of sureties on bonds to be kept.

The clerk of the chancery court shall either procure a well-bound book, arranged alphabetically and properly ruled, lined and headed to show the name of the principal and surety, name of principal obligor, name of obligee, date of bond, penalty of bond, kind of bond, where recorded if recorded, number of suit in which filed and date of discharge or provide for the electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57 of this information. In one of these manners he shall abstract each bond, when filed in his office, by entering in such record the name of each principal and surety, under the proper letter, the name of principal obligor, name of obligee, date, penalty, kind of bond, where recorded if recorded, and number of suit in which filed. And when such bond has been discharged, the date thereof shall be entered in said record under the proper heading. The clerk of the chancery court shall also, as soon as said record has been obtained, thus abstract all executor’s, administrator’s and guardian’s bonds in matters at that time pending in the chancery court of his county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 527; Hemingway’s 1917, § 284; 1930, § 345; 1942, § 1256; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-159.
Abstract of certain decrees furnished circuit clerk.

The clerk of the chancery court shall, within ten days after the expiration of the term at which any decree for money shall be made, which is enforceable by execution against the defendant, furnish an abstract of such decree to the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which such decree is made; and it shall be the duty of the circuit clerk forthwith to enroll the same on the “Judgment Roll” in his office as judgments of the circuit court are required to be enrolled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1823; 1892, § 478; 1906, § 528; Hemingway’s 1917, § 285; 1930, § 346; 1942, § 1257.

§ 9-5-161.
Clerk to make final record of causes.

The clerk shall, within three (3) months after the final termination of each suit involving real estate, record all the pleadings, proofs, exhibits and proceedings therein, or such part thereof as may be required by order of the chancellor, in a book to be kept for that purpose, and to be styled “The Book of Final Records in Chancery.” He shall likewise make a final record of all other proceedings or suits, if required by the decree or by order of the chancellor, omitting such portions from the record books as the chancellor may direct. The clerk shall also make final record of all or such portions of a former terminated proceeding or suit as may be requested by any person, upon payment by such person of the cost thereof.

It shall be the duty of the chancery clerk of any county in which there is a county court established, to record in the final record the proceedings of all or any part thereof of proceedings in said court, affecting the title of lands in said county, when requested so to do by any person interested in said lands, and upon the payment of the fee therefor by the person requesting same, and the clerk shall index same in the deed records of the county, and the filing of said proceedings or parts thereof shall be constructive notice from the date of said filing to all persons of said proceedings the same as if they had been decided by the chancery court.

The records required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be kept by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as the clerk may elect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 15; 1871 § 991; 1880, § 1808; 1892, § 462; 1906, § 511; Hemingway’s 1917, § 268; 1930, § 347; 1942, § 1258; Laws, 1946, ch. 469, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-163.
Custodian of certain records and papers.

The clerk of the chancery court shall be the custodian of all documents, records, books and papers belonging, or in any way appertaining, to the probate court, and of the board of police, formerly existing, except as to such as may be required by law to be kept by the clerk of the circuit court; and, as such custodian, he shall do and perform all acts in relation to such records, books and papers which were heretofore required of, or might lawfully have been done by, the clerk of the said probate court or board of police. All such documents, records, books and papers may be kept by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as the clerk may elect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 997; 1880, § 1824; 1892, § 479; 1906, § 529; Hemingway’s 1917, § 286; 1930, § 348; 1942, § 1259; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-165.
Removal and return of court files and documents in clerk’s office.

The clerk shall not suffer any paper filed to be withdrawn but by leave of the chancellor, and then only by retaining a copy to be made at the cost of the party obtaining the leave. Provided, however, that any duly licensed and practicing attorney in good standing in the court may remove court files and related legal papers other than youth court and adoption court files and related papers from the clerk’s office by signing therefor himself, or by a designated representative of his law office, on a record to be provided for that purpose. Such files or documents so removed shall be attested to by the clerk or his deputy at the time of removal, and said attorney shall be personally responsible for their safekeeping and return within ten (10) days, or before the first day of the next term of chancery court, whichever comes first and such files or documents shall not be removed from the county where the same are filed except that said files or documents may be taken by said attorney for use in a vacation hearing to such county where the hearing may be held. Failure to return any such court files or related legal papers as provided herein shall constitute contempt of court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 16; 1871, § 992; 1880, § 1809; 1892, § 463; 1906, § 512; Hemingway’s 1917, § 269; 1930, § 328; 1942, § 1238; Laws, 1964, ch. 308, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1964).

§ 9-5-167.
Newspaper subscribed for and preserved.

The clerk of the chancery court shall subscribe to at least one (1) and not more than two (2) of the newspapers published in his county as the court or chancellor may direct; and in the event no newspaper is published in the county, the clerk shall subscribe to the newspaper in which the publications ordered by the court are usually made. To preserve such newspapers, the clerk shall carefully file the original or microfilm copies thereof in his office, or may keep the same by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as the clerk may elect. Before the clerk may utilize microfilm copies of newspapers presently on file and of those newspapers to be received in the future, the written approval of the court and the board of supervisors must be obtained. The expense of the subscriptions and the expense of the binding of filed newspapers or of the microfilming process shall be paid out of the county treasury. Two (2) or more counties may join together and agree to accomplish the purposes of this section and to share the costs of necessary equipment, subscriptions and labor involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1827; 1892, § 481; 1906, § 531; Hemingway’s 1917, § 288; 1930, § 349; 1942, § 1260; Laws, 1972, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-5-169.
All records and papers subject to inspection.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-61-11.2, all of the records and papers of the office of the chancery clerk shall, at all reasonable hours on business days, be subject to the inspection and examination of all citizens; and the clerk shall show to any person inquiring for it where any record or paper in his or her office can be found, and shall allow him or her access to it, and to examine it and make any copy, note, or memorandum he or she desires to make of it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1826; 1892, § 480; 1906, § 530; Hemingway’s 1917, § 287; 1930, § 350; 1942, § 1261; Laws, 2019, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 9-5-171.
Destruction of records.

The chancery clerk of each of the counties of the State of Mississippi, with the approval of the board of supervisors of such county, after an inventory has been made and checked by the board and an order spread on its minutes listing the reference, is authorized to dispose of records pursuant to a records control schedule approved by the Local Government Records Committee as provided in Section 25-60-1.

No records which are in the process of being audited by the State Department of Audit or which are the basis of litigation shall be destroyed until at least twelve (12) months after final completion of the audits and litigation.

Records may be filed and retained by electronic means as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, whether the record is to be destroyed or not; provided, however, that destruction of records shall be carried out in accordance with Sections 25-59-21 and 25-59-27.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1261.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 208, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1966, ch. 337, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1987, ch. 420; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 11; Laws, 1996, ch. 537, § 7; Laws, 1998, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 495, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 9-5-173.
Register of claims against estates.

The clerk shall keep in his office a well-bound book, or by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, as the clerk may elect, to be called the “Register of Claims,” each page of which shall be divided into five (5) columns, the first to contain the creditor’s name, the second the description of the claim, the third the time when due, the fourth the amount of the claim, and the fifth the day of the registry. He shall register in said book all claims proved and allowed against any estate administered in his court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 996; 1880, § 1822; 1892, § 477; 1906, § 526; Hemingway’s 1917, § 283; 1930, § 335; 1942, § 1246; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).